Washington statutes.
RCW 4.105.050

Proof.

In ruling on a motion under RCW 4.105.020, the court shall consider the pleadings, the motion, any reply or response to the motion, and any evidence that could be considered in ruling on a motion for summary judgment under superior court civil rule 56.

[ 2021 c 259 s 6.]